Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202658-230
Meetings; when held; virtual conferencing authorized.

Meetings of the members of the authority shall be held at least once every three months to attend to the business of the authority and may be held at the call of the chairperson or whenever any five members so request. Such meetings shall at all times be subject to the Open Meetings Act, and such meetings may be held by means of virtual conferencing in accordance with section 84-1411.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 30;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 32;

Laws 1996, LB 1322, § 7;

Laws 2004, LB 821, § 14;

Laws 2021, LB83, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 66.

Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.